test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-4-nakatîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 2Sg
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-kî-nakasiyan # as you left me, as you left me behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-kî-nakatat # as you left him/her, as you left him/her behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-kî-nakasiyâhk # as you left us, as you left us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-kî-nakatacik # as you left them, as you left them behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-nakatimat # as you left another/others, as you left another/others behind

      # 3Sg
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-kî-nakasiyan # as you left me, as you left me behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: î-kî-nakatisk # as he/she left you, as he/she left you behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-kî-nakasiyâhk # as you left us, as you left us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: î-kî-nakatikoyâhk # as you left us, as you left us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: î-kî-nakasiyamiht # as you left us, as you left us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: î-kî-nakatikoyahk # as he/she left you and us, as he/she left you and us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: î-kî-nakatitahk # as he/she left you and us, as he/she left you and us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: î-kî-nakatikoyîk # as he/she left you all, as he/she left you all behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: î-kî-nakatitîk # as he/she left you all, as he/she left you all behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-kî-nakatacik # as you left them, as you left them behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-nakatimat # as you left another/others, as you left another/others behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-nakatimât # as he/she left yet another/others, as he/she left yet another/others behind

      # 1Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: î-kî-nakatitâhk # as we left you, as we left you behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: î-kî-nakatâyâhk # as we left him/her, as we left him/her behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-kî-nakatakiht # as we left him/her, as we left him/her behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: î-kî-nakatitâhk # as we left you all, as we left you all behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: î-kî-nakatâyâhkwâw # as we left them, as we left them behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-kî-nakatakihcik # as we left them, as we left them behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-nakatimâyâhk # as we left another/others, as we left another/others behind

      # 12Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: î-kî-nakatâyahk # as we and you left him/her, as we and you left him/her behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-kî-nakatahk # as we and you left him/her, as we and you left him/her behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: î-kî-nakatâyahkwâw # as we and you left them, as we and you left them behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-kî-nakatahkwâw # as we and you left them, as we and you left them behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-nakatimâyahk # as we and you left another/others, as we and you left another/others behind

      # 2Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: î-kî-nakasiyîk # as you all left me, as you all left me behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: î-kî-nakatâyîk # as you all left him/her, as you all left him/her behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: î-kî-nakasiyâhk # as you all left us, as you all left us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: î-kî-nakatâyîkwâw # as you all left them, as you all left them behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-kî-nakatâyîkok # as you all left them, as you all left them behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-nakatimâyîk # as you all left another/others, as you all left another/others behind

      # 3Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [î-kî-nakasitwâw, î-kî-nakasicik] # as they left me, as they left me behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: î-kî-nakatiskwâw # as they left you, as they left you behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: î-kî-nakatikoyâhkwâw # as they left us, as they left us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: î-kî-nakasiyamihcik # as they left us, as they left us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: î-kî-nakatikoyahkwâw # as they left you and us, as they left you and us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: î-kî-nakatitahkwâw # as they left you and us, as they left you and us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: î-kî-nakatikoyîkwâw # as they left you all, as they left you all behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: î-kî-nakatitîkwâw # as they left you all, as they left you all behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-nakatâcik # as they left another/others, as they left another/others behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-nakatimâcik # as they left yet another/others, as they left yet another/others behind

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-kî-nakatimit # as another/others left me, as another/others left me behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-kî-nakatimisk # as another/others left you, as another/others left you behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-kî-nakatikot # as another/others left him/her, as another/others left him/her behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-kî-nakatikoyâhk # as another/others left us, as another/others left us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-kî-nakatikoyahk # as another/others left you and us, as another/others left you and us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-kî-nakatikoyîk # as another/others left you all, as another/others left you all behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-kî-nakatikocik # as another/others left them, as another/others left them behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-nakatâthit # as another/others left yet another/others, as another/others left yet another/others behind

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-nakatikothit # as yet another/others left another/others, as yet another/others left another/others behind

      # X
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: î-kî-nakatikawiyân # as someone left me, as someone left me behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: î-kî-nakatikawiyan # as someone left you, as someone left you behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: î-kî-nakatiht # as someone left him/her, as someone left him/her behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: î-kî-nakatikawiyâhk # as someone left us, as someone left us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: î-kî-nakatikawiyahk # as someone left you and us, as someone left you and us behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: î-kî-nakatikawiyîk # as someone left you all, as someone left you all behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: î-kî-nakatihcik # as someone left them, as someone left them behind
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-nakatimiht # as someone left another/others, as someone left another/others behind

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-kî-nakatikoyân
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-kî-nakatikoyan
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-kî-nakatikot
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-kî-nakatikoyâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-kî-nakatikoyahk
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-kî-nakatikoyîk
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-kî-nakatikocik
      PV/î+PV/ki+nakatîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-nakatikothit
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind

      # 1Sg
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kiwî-nakatitin # I am going to leave you, I am going to leave you behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: niwî-nakatâw # I am going to leave him/her, I am going to leave him/her behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kiwî-nakatitinâwâw # I am going to leave you all, I am going to leave you all behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: niwî-nakatâwak # I am going to leave them, I am going to leave them behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: niwî-nakatimâwa # I am going to leave another/others, I am going to leave another/others behind

      # 2Sg
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwî-nakasin # you are going to leave me, you are going to leave me behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kiwî-nakatâw # you are going to leave him/her, you are going to leave him/her behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwî-nakasinân # you are going to leave us, you are going to leave us behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwî-nakatâwak # you are going to leave them, you are going to leave them behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-nakatimâwa # you are going to leave another/others, you are going to leave another/others behind

      # 3Sg
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwî-nakasin # you are going to leave me, you are going to leave me behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kiwî-nakatik # he/she is going to leave you, he/she is going to leave you behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwî-nakasinân # you are going to leave us, you are going to leave us behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kiwî-nakatikonaw # he/she is going to leave you and us, he/she is going to leave you and us behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kiwî-nakatikowâw # he/she is going to leave you all, he/she is going to leave you all behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwî-nakatâwak # you are going to leave them, you are going to leave them behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-nakatimâwa # you are going to leave another/others, you are going to leave another/others behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wî-nakatimîw # he/she is going to leave yet another/others, he/she is going to leave yet another/others behind

      # 1Pl
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kiwî-nakatitinân # we are going to leave you, we are going to leave you behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: niwî-nakatânân # we are going to leave him/her, we are going to leave him/her behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kiwî-nakatitinân # we are going to leave you all, we are going to leave you all behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: niwî-nakatânânak # we are going to leave them, we are going to leave them behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: niwî-nakatimânâna # we are going to leave another/others, we are going to leave another/others behind

      # 12Pl
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kiwî-nakatânaw # we and you are going to leave him/her, we and you are going to leave him/her behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kiwî-nakatânawak # we and you are going to leave them, we and you are going to leave them behind
      PV/wi+nakatîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-nakatimânawa # we and you are going to leave another/others, we and you are going to leave another/others behind
